Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1304.01
State highways; federal aid; further assent.

The Legislature hereby reaffirms its continuing assent to the federal acts set forth in section 39-1304.

Laws 1957, c. 171, § 1, p. 592.